Idaho, session 2025, H0265.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 41-1830, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
41-1830. NOTICE OF LAPSE OR TERMINATION OF INDIVIDUAL LIFE INSUR-
ANCE. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 41-1927, Idaho Code, an
individual life insurance policy shall not be issued or delivered in this
state until the applicant has been afforded the option of designating one (1)
person, in addition to the applicant, to receive notice of lapse or termina-
tion of a policy for nonpayment of premium.
(2) A designation made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall
be on a form provided by the insurer. The applicant shall, on such form, pro-
vide the full name, address and telephone number of the person designated to
receive notice of lapse or termination of the policy for nonpayment of pre-
mium.
(3) The insurer shall annually notify a policy owner of the right to:
(a) Make a designation pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;
(b) Change the designee; and
(c) Update the contact information of the designee.
(4) The policy owner may, at the policy owner's discretion, change the
designee or change the contact information of the designee more often than
annually, and the insurer shall make available the form for such changes at
the policy owner's request.
(5) No individual life insurance policy shall lapse or be terminated
for nonpayment of premium unless the insurer, at least fourteen (14) days
prior to the effective date of the lapse or termination, sends notice by
first-class first class United States mail to the policy owner and to the
policy owner's designee, if a designation has been made pursuant to this
section, of the lapse or termination, at the address or addresses provided by
the policy owner for purposes of receiving such notice.
(6) In addition to the notice required pursuant to subsection (5) of
this section, the policy owner of an individual life insurance policy issued
with a face amount in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) may request
that a lapse or termination notice be sent by United States postal service
certified mail, return receipt requested. The request must be made to the
insurer in writing at least ninety (90) days prior to a lapse or termination,
and the insurer shall acknowledge the request in writing to the policy owner,


which will serve as verification that the request was received. The certi-
fied mail lapse or termination notice shall be sent at the insurer's expense
at least ten (10) days prior to the effective date of the lapse or termination
to the policy owner and to the policy owner's designee, if a designation has
been made pursuant to this section, at the address or addresses provided by
the policy owner for purposes of receiving such notice. If the notice by cer-
tified mail is undeliverable or refused, the insurer shall have no further
obligation under this subsection.
(6) (7) The provisions of this section shall apply to any individual
life insurance policy issued or in force on or after January 1, 2018 2026.
Provided however, that the provisions of this section do not apply to any
life insurance policy under which premiums are payable monthly or more fre-
quently.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.